Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3226
Districts; bonds; issuance.

Each district shall have the power and authority to issue revenue bonds for the purpose of financing construction of facilities authorized by law. Issuance of revenue bonds must be approved by two-thirds of the members of the board of directors of the district. The district shall pledge sufficient revenue from any revenue-producing facility constructed with the aid of revenue bonds for the payment of principal and interest on such bonds and shall establish rates for such facilities at a sufficient level to provide for the operation of such facilities and for the bond payments.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 26, p. 116;

Laws 1971, LB 534, § 1;

Laws 1972, LB 540, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 480, § 8;

Laws 1998, LB 896, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 436, § 4.